California statutes. Education Code
(a) A physician, psychiatrist, oculist, dentist, dental hygienist, optometrist, otologist, podiatrist, audiologist, or nurse who is not employed in that capacity by the State Department of Public Health, shall not be, and any other person shall not be, employed or permitted to supervise the health and physical development of students unless they hold a services credential with a specialization in health or a valid credential issued before November 27, 1970, or unless they meet applicable minimum qualifications established by the board of governors.

(b) Any psychologist employed pursuant to this section shall hold a school psychologist credential, a general pupil personnel services credential authorizing service as a school
 psychologist, a standard designated services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services authorizing service as a psychologist, a services credential issued by the board of governors or the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or meet applicable minimum qualifications established by the board of governors.

(c) An authorization for service as a school nurse shall not authorize teaching services unless the individual is qualified for faculty service pursuant to minimum qualifications established by the board of governors.

(d) A physician employed by a community college district to perform medical services on a halftime or greater than halftime basis shall hold a valid certificate to practice medicine and surgery issued by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California. The qualifications for a physician employed for less than halftime
 shall be a valid certificate to practice medicine and surgery issued by the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 26.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

87449.

When an instructor of classes for adults serves sufficient probationary time to be eligible for election to permanent classification in that district, his or her tenure shall be for service which is equivalent to the average number of hours per week which he or she has served during his or her probationary years. In no case shall such an employee be classified as permanent for more than one full-time assignment. The service for which such a person has acquired tenure may be reduced in conformity with Sections 87743 and 87744.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 63.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87451.

Nothing in Section 87468 shall be construed to give regular classification to a person in the adult school who is already classified as a regular employee in the day school. In case an instructor obtains permanent classification in the evening school and later is eligible for the same classification in the day school by reason of having served the contract period therein, he or she shall be given a choice as to which classification he or she shall take.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, service in the evening school shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a regular employee in the day school, except service in the evening school rendered by a person rendering services in the day school who is directed or specifically requested by the community college district to render services in the evening school either in addition to, or instead of, rendering service in the day school. Service in the day school shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a regular employee in the evening school, except service in the day school rendered by a person rendering services in the evening school who is directed or specifically requested by the community college district to render service in the day school either in addition to, or instead of, rendering service in the evening school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 146.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87453.

No regular employee of a community college district shall be dismissed without his or her consent or deprived of his or her classification as a regular employee of the district when the district does not have sufficient funds to pay his salary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87454.

A tenured employee, when assigned from a faculty position to an educational administrative position, or assigned any special or other type of work, or given special classification or designation, shall retain his or her status as a tenured faculty member.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 64.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87457.

Whenever a person employed in an administrative position is assigned to a faculty position, the governing board of the community college district shall give the employee, when requested by him or her, a written statement of the reasons for the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973, Sec. 32.   Operative July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 70(d) of Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

87458.

A person employed in an administrative position that is not part of the classified service, who has not previously acquired tenured status as a faculty member in the same district and who is not under contract in a program or project to perform services conducted under contract with public or private agencies, or in other categorically funded projects of indeterminate duration, shall have the right to become a first-year probationary faculty member once his or her administrative assignment expires or is terminated if all of the following apply:

(a) The process by which the governing board reaches the determination shall be developed and agreed upon jointly by representatives of the governing board and the academic senate, and approved by the governing board. The agreed upon process shall include reasonable procedures to ensure that the governing board relies primarily upon the advice and judgment of the academic senate to determine that the administrator possesses the minimum qualifications for employment as a faculty member. The process shall further require that the governing board provide the academic senate with an opportunity to present its views to the governing board before the board makes a determination and that the written record of the decision, including the views of the academic senate, shall be available for review pursuant to Section 87358.

(b) Until a joint agreement is reached pursuant to subdivision (a), the district process in existence on January 1, 1989, shall remain in effect.

(c) The administrator has completed at least two years of satisfactory service, including any time previously served as a faculty member, in the district.

(d) The termination of the administrative assignment is for any reason other than dismissal for cause.

(e) This section shall apply to every educational administrator whose first day of paid service in the district as a faculty member or an administrator is on or after July 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

87458.1.

(a) A person employed in an administrative or supervisory position requiring certification qualifications upon completing a probationary period, including any time served as a classroom instructor, in the same district, shall be classified as and become a regular employee as a classroom instructor.

(b) This section shall only apply to persons whose first day of paid service in the district without a break in service precedes July 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 66.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87459.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 87458 to the contrary, the governing board of any community college district shall, with respect to each person who is employed in an administrative or supervisory position requiring certification qualifications under a contract of employment providing a four-year term of employment and who either has not been previously employed by the district in such position or has been employed in such position but not under such a four-year contract, determine prior to May 15 of the third year under such four-year contract of employment whether to grant or deny the person regular classification as a classroom instructor. If the board grants the classification, the person shall be classified as and become a regular employee as a classroom instructor. This section shall only apply to persons whose first day of paid service in the district without a break in service precedes July 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 67.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87460.

A person employed in an administrative or supervisory position by more than one district shall be given regular classification in whichever district he or she may select for the regular classification. Other regular classification shall be given to such an employee in a district situated wholly or partly within a city or city and county where the charter of the city or city and county provides for other classification. This section shall apply only to persons whose first day of paid service in the district without a break in service precedes July 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87462.

A permanent employee of a high school district who was classified as such while serving in a community college maintained by the high school district shall, if the high school district is included in a community college district, be classified as a regular employee of the community college district if employed by the community college district in a faculty position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 70.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87463.

Any community college faculty member who instructs in a four-year state institution of higher education maintained on the campus of the community college pursuant to contracts entered into between the Trustees of the California State University and the district, shall, without regard to subject or grade taught, whether of community college level or higher, acquire and retain all rights to employment in the district the same as though the employee were teaching exclusively in a community college of the district. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the employee from resigning from employment in the district pursuant to the provisions of Section 87730.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 71.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87464.

The division, uniting, unification, or consolidation of any community college district or districts, or any change in district boundaries or organization, shall not affect the classification of academic employees already employed by any district affected. These employees shall have the same status with respect to their classification by the district, including time served as contract employees of the district after the division, uniting, unification, or consolidation, or change in district boundaries or organization as they had prior thereto. If the division, uniting, unification, or consolidation, or change in district boundaries or organization results in the college or other place in which any such employee is employed being maintained by another district, the employee, if a regular employee of the district that formerly maintained the college or other place of employment, shall be employed as a regular employee of the district which thereafter maintains the college or other place of employment, unless the employee elects to continue in the employ of the first district. If the employee is a contract employee of the district that formerly maintained the college or other place of employment, he or she shall be employed by the district which thereafter maintains the college or other place of employment, unless the contract employee is terminated by the district pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 87600). If not so terminated, his or her status with respect to classification by the district shall be the same as it would have been had the college or other place of employment continued to be maintained by the district that formerly maintained it. As used in this paragraph, “the college or other place in which any employee is employed” and all references thereto, includes, but is not limited to, the college services or college program which, as a result of any division, uniting, unification, or consolidation of a district, will be provided by another district, irrespective of whether any particular building or buildings in which the service or program was conducted is physically located in the new district and irrespective of whether any new district resulting from the division elects to provide for the education of its students by contracting with another community college district until the time that the new district constructs its own facilities.

As used in this section, “any change in district boundaries or organization” includes, but is not limited to, the formation of a community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87467.

The retirement of any employee of a community college district under the provisions of any retirement law shall automatically effect the dismissal of the employee from the employ of the district at the end of the current school year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87468.

A contract employee who, in any one college year, has served for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the district in which he or she is employed are maintained shall be deemed to have served a complete college year. In case of evening schools, 75 percent of the number of days the evening schools of the district are in session shall be deemed a complete college year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87469.

Notwithstanding Section 87468, a contract employee employed by a community college district who, in any college year consisting of two semesters or three quarters, has served more than 75 percent of the number of hours considered as a full-time assignment for regular employees having similar duties in the community colleges of the district in which he or she is employed, shall be deemed to have served a complete college year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 152.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87470.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district may employ academic employees, including educational administrators, in programs and projects to perform services conducted under contract with public or private agencies, or other categorically funded projects of indeterminate duration under terms and conditions mutually agreed upon by the employee and the governing board. The agreement shall be reduced to writing.

(2) Service pursuant to this section shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a regular employee of a community college district unless both of the following occur:

(A) The person has served as a faculty member pursuant to this section for at least 75 percent of the number of days in regular schools of the district by which he or she is employed are maintained.

(B) The person is subsequently employed as a contract employee in a faculty position.

(3) Persons may be employed for periods that are less than a full college year, and may be terminated at the expiration of the contract or specially funded project without regard to other requirements of this code respecting the termination of contract or regular employees.

(b) This section shall not be construed to apply to any faculty member who has been employed in the regular educational programs of the district as a contract employee before being subsequently assigned to any one of these programs, nor shall it apply to those employees employed in programs operated pursuant to, or funded pursuant to, Article 8 (commencing with Section 69640) of Chapter 2 of Part 42, or Section 84850.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon termination or expiration of employment under this section, a person employed as an educational administrator shall not be entitled to the rights set forth in Section 87458 unless those rights are provided pursuant to his or her contract of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

87471.

Service by a person as an instructor in classes conducted at regional occupational centers or programs, as authorized pursuant to Section 52301, shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a regular employee of a community college district.

This section shall not be construed to apply to any faculty member who has been employed to instruct in the regular educational programs of the district and subsequently assigned as an instructor in regional occupational centers or programs, nor shall it affect the status of regional occupational center instructors classified as regular or contract at the time this section becomes effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 74.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87473.

Service under a credential authorizing service only as an instructor of basic military drill in community college cadet companies established under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 500) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Military and Veterans Code shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a regular employee of a community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87474.

(a) Nothing in this code shall be construed as permitting a faculty member to acquire regular classification with respect to employment in either of the following:

(1) A summer term maintained by a community college district.

(2) An intersession term maintained by a community college district, if the exclusion of the intersession term is in accordance with a collective bargaining agreement applicable to that employee.

(b) Service in connection with the employment referenced in subdivision (a) shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility for, classification as a regular employee of the district.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that this section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the preexisting law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

87475.

If an employee of a community college district has served as a contract employee of the district in a faculty position, for one complete school year, and in the year immediately preceding the service as contract employee has served as a temporary faculty member for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the district were maintained, the governing board of the district may count the year of employment as a temporary employee as one year of the probationary period which he or she is required by law to serve as a condition to being classified as a regular employee of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 77.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87477.

Governing boards of community college districts shall classify as contract employees, those faculty members who have not been classified as regular employees or as temporary employees. The classification shall be made at the time of employment and thereafter in the month of July of each school year. At the time of initial employment during each academic year, each new faculty member shall receive a written statement indicating his or her employment status and the salary that he or she is to be paid. If a community college district hires a faculty member as a temporary employee, the written statement shall clearly indicate the temporary nature of the employment and the length of time for which the person is being employed. If a written statement does not indicate the temporary nature of the employment, the faculty member shall be deemed to be a contract employee of the community college district, unless employed with regular status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 79.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87478.

Except as provided in Sections 87481 and 87482, governing boards of community college districts shall classify faculty employed to fill positions of regularly employed persons absent from service as temporary employees.

After September 1 of any school year, the governing board of a community college district may employ, for the remainder of the school year, in temporary status any otherwise qualified person who consents to be so employed in a position for which no regular employee is available, including persons retired for service under the State Teachers’ Retirement System. Inability to acquire the services of a qualified regular employee shall be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of governors.

Any person employed for one complete school year as a temporary employee shall, if reemployed for the following school year in a faculty position, be classified by the governing board as a contract employee and the previous year’s employment as a temporary employee shall be deemed a year of employment as a contract employee for purposes of acquiring regular status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 80.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87480.

Governing boards of community college districts shall classify as temporary employees faculty members, who are employed to serve from day to day during the first three school months of any school term to instruct temporary classes not to exist after the first three school months of any school term or to perform any other duties which do not last longer than the first three school months of any school term, or to instruct in special day and evening classes for adults or in schools of migratory population for not more than four school months of any school term. If the classes or duties continue beyond the first three school months of any school term or four school months for special day and evening classes for adults, or schools for migratory population, the employee, unless a regular employee, shall be classified as a contract employee. The school year may be divided into not more than two school terms for the purposes of this section.

In any district, the governing board may, to prevent the stoppage of district business when an actual emergency arises and persons are not immediately available for contract classification, make an appointment to a position on a temporary basis for a period not to exceed 20 working days. The person so appointed shall be deemed to be a temporary employee who is employed to serve from day to day. Service by a person in such an appointment on a temporary basis shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a regular employee of a community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 81.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87481.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 87478 and 87480, the governing board of a community college district may employ any qualified individual as a temporary faculty member for a complete school year, but not less than one semester or quarter during a school year unless the date of rendering first paid service begins during the second semester or third quarter and prior to March 15th. The employment of these persons shall be based upon the need for additional faculty during a particular semester, quarter, or year because a faculty member has been granted leave for a semester, quarter, or year, or is experiencing long-term illness, and shall be limited, in number of persons so employed, to that need, as determined by the governing board.

Any person employed for one complete school year as a temporary employee shall, if reemployed for the following school year in a vacant faculty position, be classified by the governing board as a contract employee and the previous year’s employment as a temporary employee shall be deemed a year of employment as a contract employee for purposes of acquiring permanent status.

For purposes of this section “vacant position” means a position in which the employee is qualified to serve and which is not filled by a regular or contract employee. It shall not include a position which would be filled by a regular or contract employee except for the fact that such employee is on leave.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 82.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 87480, the governing board of a community college district may employ a qualified individual as a temporary faculty member for a complete academic year, but not less than a complete semester or quarter during an academic year. The employment of those persons shall be based upon the need for additional faculty during a particular semester or quarter because of the higher enrollment of students during that semester or quarter as compared to the other semester or quarter in the academic year, or because a faculty member has been granted leave for a semester, quarter, or academic year, or is experiencing long-term illness, and shall be limited, in number of persons so employed, to that need, as determined by the governing board of the community college district.

(2) Employment of a person under this subdivision may be pursuant to a contract fixing a salary for the entire semester or quarter.

(b) A person, other than a person serving as clinical nursing faculty and exempted from this subdivision pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), shall not be employed by a single community college district under this section for more than two semesters or three quarters within any period of three consecutive academic years.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person serving as full-time clinical nursing faculty or as part-time clinical nursing faculty teaching the hours per week described in Section 87482.5 may be employed by a single community
 college district under this section for up to four semesters or six quarters within any period of three consecutive academic years.

(2) A community college district that employs faculty pursuant to this subdivision shall provide data to the chancellor’s office as to the number of faculty members hired under this subdivision, and what the ratio of full-time to part-time faculty was for each of the three academic years before the hiring of faculty under this subdivision and for each academic year for which faculty is hired under this subdivision. This data shall be submitted, in writing, to the chancellor’s office on or before June 30 of each year.

(3) (A) The chancellor shall report, in writing, to the Legislature and the Governor on or before September 30 of each
 year, except as provided in subparagraph (B), and in accordance with data received pursuant to paragraph (2), the number of community college districts that hired faculty under this subdivision, the number of faculty members hired under this subdivision, and what the ratio of full-time to part-time faculty was for these community college districts in each of the three academic years before the operation of this subdivision and for each academic year for which faculty is hired under this subdivision.

(B) Beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, the chancellor shall submit biennially, on or before March 1, the report described in subparagraph (A) to the Legislature and the Governor, and may submit this report with the report required by subdivision (a) of Section 88826.5.

(4) A community college district may not employ a person pursuant to this subdivision if the hiring of that person results in an increase in the ratio of part-time to full-time nursing faculty in that district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 27.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.3.

(a) (1) As a condition of receiving funds allocated for the Student Success and Support Program in the annual Budget Act, on or after July 1, 2017, community college districts that do not have a collective bargaining agreement with part-time, temporary faculty in effect as of January 1, 2017, shall commence negotiations with the exclusive representatives for part-time, temporary faculty regarding
 the terms and conditions required by subdivision (b). The parties shall negotiate these rights for part-time, temporary faculty.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that both of the following shall occur:

(A) The adoption of provisions in compliance with subdivision (b) shall be included as part of the usual and customary negotiations between the community college district and the exclusive representative for part-time, temporary faculty.

(B) (i) A community college district shall
 establish minimum standards for the terms of reemployment preference for part-time, temporary faculty assignments through the negotiation process between the community college district and the exclusive representative for part-time, temporary faculty. These standards shall include all of the following:

(I) The length of time part-time, temporary faculty have served at the community college or district.

(II) The number of courses part-time, temporary faculty have taught at the community college or district.

(III) The evaluations of temporary faculty conducted pursuant to
 Section 87663 and other related methods of evaluation that can reliably be used to assess educational impact of temporary faculty as it relates to student success.

(IV) The availability, willingness, and expertise of part-time, temporary faculty to teach specific classes or take on specific assignments that are necessary for student instruction or services.

(ii) Additional standards may be considered and established through the negotiation process, as necessary.

(iii) Standards established pursuant to clause (ii) shall reflect the processes and procedures for both of the following:

(I) Assigning part-time, temporary faculty to teach courses or staff
 nonclassroom assignments.

(II) Evaluating part-time, temporary faculty. 

(b) As a condition of receiving funds allocated for the Student Success and Support Program in the annual Budget Act and except as provided in subdivision (d), a community college district described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the exclusive representative of the part-time, temporary faculty shall negotiate in good faith all of the following:

(1) The terms of reemployment preference for part-time, temporary faculty assignments based on the minimum standards up to the range of 60 to 67 percent of a full-time equivalent load. These terms shall also contain policies for termination, including, but not limited to, the evaluation process negotiated pursuant to
 paragraph (2).

(2) A regular evaluation process for part-time, temporary faculty pursuant to the requirements of Section 87663.

(c) A community college district that has a collective bargaining agreement in effect as of July 1, 2017, that has satisfied the requirements of subdivision (b), and that executes a signed written agreement with the exclusive representative of the part-time, temporary faculty acknowledging implementation of subdivision (b), shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section while the bargaining agreement is in effect.

(d) In all cases, part-time faculty assignments shall be temporary in nature, contingent on enrollment and funding, and subject to program changes, and no part-time faculty member shall have reasonable
 assurance of continued employment at any point, irrespective of the status, length of service, or reemployment preference of that part-time, temporary faculty member.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 877) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   (SB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, in the state’s community college system, teaching constitutes a greater share of the faculty workload, as compared to the California State University or the University of California systems. California’s community college system requires that a faculty member hold, as a basic qualification, a master’s degree. Furthermore, the community college system uses a different professional review process, as compared to the California State University or the University of California systems.

(b) The California Postsecondary Education Commission shall conduct a comprehensive study of the California Community College system’s part-time faculty employment, salary, and compensation patterns as they relate to full-time community college faculty with similar education credentials and work experience. The study shall include a representative sample of urban, rural, and suburban community colleges in California and shall also refer to similarly situated community colleges in other states.

(c) The study specified in subdivision (b) shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the addressing of policy options available to achieve pay equity between community college part-time faculty and full-time faculty and shall also include both of the following:

(1) A quantitative analysis examining duties and tasks of part-time faculty as compared to full-time faculty. The duties and tasks examined shall include classroom teaching, preparation, office hours, recordkeeping, student evaluations, recommendations, and other professional practices that compare the similarities and differences between a part-time and full-time faculty position. This quantitative analysis shall also include both of the following:

(A) An examination of whether part-time faculty salaries vary significantly among community colleges and the factors that are associated with any salary differential.

(B) Data concerning the salary compensation pattern for part-time community college faculty in California and in similarly situated community colleges in other states, and the disparity between part-time and full-time compensation for the equivalent education and experience.

(2) An identification of specific policy and fiscal recommendations that would enable the California Community Colleges to achieve a compensation schedule that achieves pay equity for part-time faculty.

(d) The California Postsecondary Education Commission shall, in conducting the study required by this section, consult various representatives of the education community, including the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, community college faculty groups, and other interested parties.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, the California Postsecondary Education Commission shall release the preliminary findings of the study required by this section to the Legislature and the Governor, on or before March 31, 2000, and shall transmit the study to the Legislature and the Governor on or before July 1, 2000.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding for conducting the study required by this section shall be made available through an appropriation, either in future legislation or in the annual Budget Act, in an amount of up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who is employed to teach adult or community college classes for not more than 67 percent of the hours per week considered a full-time assignment for regular employees having comparable duties shall be classified as a temporary employee, and shall not become a contract employee under Section 87604. If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on or before January 1, 2009, the provisions of this section shall govern the employees subject to that agreement upon the expiration of the agreement.

(b) Service as a substitute on a day-to-day basis by persons employed under this section shall not be used for purposes of calculating eligibility for contract or regular status.

(c) (1) Service in professional ancillary activities by persons employed under this section, including, but not necessarily limited to, governance, staff development, grant writing, and advising student organizations, shall not be used for purposes of calculating eligibility for contract or regular status unless otherwise provided for in a collective bargaining agreement applicable to a person employed under this section.

(2) This subdivision may not be construed to affect the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 84362.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

87482.6.

(a) Until the provisions of Section 84750 regarding program-based funding are implemented by a standard adopted by the board of governors that establishes the appropriate percentage of hours of credit instruction that should be taught by full-time instructors, the Legislature wishes to recognize and make efforts to address longstanding policy of the board of governors that at least 75 percent of the hours of credit instruction in the California Community Colleges, as a system, should be taught by full-time instructors. To this end, community college districts which have less than 75 percent of their hours of credit instruction taught by full-time instructors shall apply a portion of the program improvement allocation received pursuant to Section 84755 as follows:

(1) Districts which, in the prior fiscal year, had between 67 percent and 75 percent of their hours of credit instruction taught by full-time instructors shall apply up to 33 percent of their program improvement allocation as necessary to reach the 75 percent standard. If a district in this category chooses instead not to improve its percentage, the board of governors shall withhold 33 percent of the district’s program improvement allocation.
